Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1328.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXIX-JVETERANS PROPERTY TAX REBATEAND RENT REBATE ASSISTANCESection 2901-J. Scope of article.12345678910111213141516171819202122 This article relates to veterans property tax rebate and rent rebate assistance.Section 2902-J. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Account." The Veterans Property Tax Rebate and Rent Rebate Assistance Account."Board." The Board of Finance and Revenue of the Commonwealth."Claim." A claim for a property tax rebate or rent rebate under this article."Claimant." An individual who is a veteran honorably discharged from the armed forces of the United States, including the National Guard, within the past three years and who files a claim."DD214." A United States Department of Defense Report of Separation Form 214 or a similarly effective form issued by the Department of Defense relating to separation from military service."DD215." A United States Department of Defense Incomplete Awards, Decorations and Discharges Form 215 or similarly effective form issued by the Department of Defense to correct errors or make additions to a DD214 in order to ensure that a veteran has accurate discharge documentation."Department." The Department of Revenue of the Commonwealth. "Homestead." As follows:(1) A dwelling, whether owned or rented, and so much of the land surrounding it as is reasonably necessary for the use of the dwelling as a home, occupied by a claimant.20250HB1328PN1528 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The term includes:(i) Premises occupied by reason of ownership or lease in a cooperative housing corporation.(ii) A mobile home that is assessed as realty for local property tax purposes and the land, if owned or rented by the claimant, upon which the mobile home is situated, and other similar living accommodations.(iii) A part of a multidwelling or multipurpose building and a part of the land upon which it is built.(iv) Premises occupied by reason of a claimant's ownership or rental of a dwelling located on land owned by a nonprofit incorporated association of which the claimant is a member, if the claimant is required to pay a pro rata share of the property taxes levied against the association's land.(v) Premises occupied by a claimant if the claimant is required by law to pay a property tax by reason of the claimant's ownership or rental, including a possessory interest, in the dwelling, the land or both. Ownership includes possession under a contract of sale, deed of trust, life estate, joint tenancy or tenancy in common or by reason of statutes of descent and distribution."Property tax rebate." A rebate under this article for real property taxes."Real property taxes." All taxes on a homestead, exclusive of municipal assessments, delinquent charges and interest, due and payable during a calendar year."Rent in lieu of property taxes." Rent due and payable during a calendar year to a landlord in connection with the occupancy of a homestead, irrespective of whether the amount 20250HB1328PN1528 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 constitutes payment solely for the right of occupancy or otherwise."Rent rebate." A rebate under this article for rent in lieu of property taxes."Secretary." The Secretary of Revenue of the Commonwealth."Veteran." An individual who served in the armed forces of the United States, including the National Guard.Section 2903-J. Establishment of program.The Veterans Property Tax Rebate and Rent Rebate Assistance Program is established in the department and shall be administered as provided in this article.Section 2904-J. Property tax rebate and rent rebate.(a) Schedule of rebates.--(1) As follows:(i) The base amount of a claim for a property tax rebate for real property taxes due and payable during a calendar year shall be determined in accordance with the following schedule:Household IncomeAmount of Real Property TaxesAllowed as Rebate$ 0 - $ 8,000 $650 8,001 - 15,000 500 15,001 - 18,000 300 18,001 - 35,000 250(ii) The supplemental amount for a claimant with a household income equal to or less than $30,000 and an eligible claim for a property tax rebate for real property taxes due and payable during a calendar year and whose real property taxes exceed 15% of the claimant's household income shall be equal to 50% of the base amount 20250HB1328PN1528 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 determined under subparagraph (i). A claimant who is a resident of a city of the first class, a city of the second class A or a school district of the first class A shall be ineligible for the supplemental amount under this subparagraph.(2) The amount of a claim for a rent rebate for rent due and payable during a calendar year shall be determined in accordance with the following:Household IncomeAmount of Rent in Lieu ofProperty TaxesAllowed as Rebate$ 0 - $ 8,000 $650 8,001 - 15,000 500 15,001 - 18,000 300 18,001 - 35,000 250(b) Limitations on claims.--(1) No claim during a calendar year shall be allowed if the amount of the property tax rebate or rent rebate, computed in accordance with this section, is less than $10.(2) During a calendar year, the maximum amount of the property tax rebate or rent rebate shall not exceed the lesser of:(i) the amount of a claim under subsection (a); or(ii) either of the following:(A) the amount of real property taxes actually paid; or(B) twenty percent of the gross amount actually paid in cash or its equivalent in any calendar year regarding the rent in lieu of property taxes.(3) No claim shall be allowed if the claimant is a 20250HB1328PN1528 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tenant of an owner of real property exempt from real property taxes.(c) Apportionment and public assistance.--(1) If a claim relates to a homestead owned or rented and occupied for only a portion of a year or owned or rented in part by a person who does not meet the qualifications for a claimant, exclusive of an interest owned or leased by a claimant's spouse, the department shall apportion the real property taxes or rent in accordance with the period or degree of ownership or leasehold or eligibility of the claimant in determining the amount of rebate for which a claimant is eligible.(2) A claimant who receives public assistance from the Department of Human Services shall not be eligible for a rent rebate during those months within which the claimant receives public assistance.(d) Government subsidies.--Rent in lieu of property taxes shall not include subsidies provided by or through a governmental agency.Section 2905-J. Filing of claim.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), a claim must be filed with the department on or before June 30 of the year following the end of the calendar year in which real property taxes or rent in lieu of property taxes was due and payable.(b) Exception.--A claim filed after the June 30 deadline until December 31 of the same calendar year shall be accepted by the secretary if funds are available to pay the benefits to the late filing claimant.(c) Payments.--No reimbursement on a claim shall be made 20250HB1328PN1528 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 earlier than July 1 of the calendar year in which the claim was filed.(d) Eligibility of claimants.--(1) Only one claimant from a homestead each year shall be entitled to the property tax rebate or rent rebate.(2) If two or more persons are able to meet the qualifications for a claimant, they may determine who the claimant shall be. If they are unable to determine who the claimant shall be, the department shall determine to whom the property tax rebate or rent rebate is to be paid.Section 2906-J. Proof of claim.(a) Contents.--Each claim shall include:(1) A DD214 or DD215, issued within the last three years.(2) The size and nature of the property claimed as a homestead.(3) Rent receipts, tax receipt or other proof that the real property taxes on the homestead have been paid or that the rent in connection with the occupancy of a homestead has been paid.(4) Other information as required by the department.(b) Direct payment of taxes or rent not required.--Rent or real property taxes do not need to have been paid directly by the claimant if the rent or real property taxes have been paid on or before the filing of the claim.Section 2907-J. Incorrect claim.If on audit of a claim the department finds the claim to have been incorrectly determined, the department shall redetermine the correct amount of the claim and shall notify the claimant of the reason for the redetermination and the amount of the 20250HB1328PN1528 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 corrected claim.Section 2908-J. Funds for payment of claims.(a) Establishment.--The Veterans Property Tax Rebate and Rent Rebate Assistance Account is established as a restricted account in the State Treasury. The account shall be for the purpose of funding property tax rebates and rent rebates under this article. The account shall earn interest, which shall be credited by the State Treasurer to the account.(b) Transfer.--The sum of $40,000,000 is transferred from the General Fund to the account.(c) Appropriation.--Money transferred to the account is appropriated on a continuing basis to the Department of Revenue for use in funding property tax rebates and rent rebates as specified under this article.Section 2909-J. Rules and regulations and procedures generally.(a) Promulgation and administration.--(1) The secretary shall prescribe necessary rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of this article, in consultation with the Secretary of Community and Economic Development.(2) The department shall receive all applications, determine the eligibility of claimants, hear appeals, disburse payments and make available suitable forms for the filing of claims.(b) Report to General Assembly.--In addition to any rules and regulations prescribed under subsection (a), the department shall collect the following information and issue a report including the information to the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate and the chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations 20250HB1328PN1528 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Committee of the House of Representatives by September 30, 2026, and September 30 of each year thereafter:(1) The total number of claims under this article made in the fiscal year in which the report is issued, categorized by school district and by county.(2) The total amount of rebates under this article paid in the fiscal year in which the report is issued, categorized by school district and by county.Section 2910-J. Fraudulent claims and conveyances to obtain benefits.(a) Civil penalty.--If a claim is excessive or otherwise fraudulent, the claim shall be disallowed in full, and a penalty of 25% of the amount claimed shall be imposed. The penalty and the amount of the disallowed claim, if the claim has been paid, shall bear interest at the rate of 1.5% per month from the date of the claim until repaid.(b) Criminal penalty.--A claimant and any person who assists in the preparation or filing of the claim described in subsection (a) commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and, upon conviction thereof, shall be sentenced to pay a fine not exceeding $1,000 or to imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both.(c) Disallowance for receipt of title.--A claim shall be disallowed if the claimant received title to the homestead primarily for the purpose of receiving a property tax rebate.Section 2911-J. Petition for redetermination.(a) Right to file.--If the department denies, corrects or takes any other adverse action regarding a claim, the claimant may, within 90 days after the date that the department mailed written notice to the claimant of the adverse action, file with 20250HB1328PN1528 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department a petition for redetermination on a form supplied by the department.(b) Contents.--The petition under subsection (a) shall:(1) State the grounds upon which the claimant alleges that the action is erroneous or unlawful, in whole or part.(2) Contain an affidavit or affirmation that the facts contained in the petition are true and correct.(c) Extension of time for filing.-- An extension of time for filing the petition under subsection (a) may be allowed for cause but may not exceed 120 days.(d) Hearings.--(1) Subject to subsection (e), the department shall hold any necessary hearing on petitions under subsection (a).(2) The department shall provide the claimant notice of any hearing on the claimant's petition under subsection (a). Notice shall include the date, time and place of the hearing.(e) Time period for determination.--Within six months after receiving a claimant's petition under subsection (a), the department shall dispose of the matters raised in the petition and shall mail notice to the claimant of the department's determination.Section 2912-J. Review by board.(a) Right to review.--Within 90 days after the date of official receipt by the claimant of notice mailed by the department of its decision under section 2911-J, the claimant who is adversely affected by the decision may by petition request the board to review the action.(b) Effect of no decision from department.--(1) Failure of the department to officially notify the claimant of a decision within the six-month period under 20250HB1328PN1528 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 2911-J(e) shall act as a denial of the petition.(2) A petition for review may be filed with the board within 120 days after written notice is officially received by the claimant that the department has failed to dispose of the petition within the six-month period.(c) Contents of petition for redetermination.--A petition for review under this section shall state the reasons for review or shall incorporate by reference the petition for redetermination under section 2911-J. The petition shall be supported by affidavit that the facts stated in the petition for review are correct and true.(d) Decision.--(1) The board shall dispose of each petition for review under this section within six months after the petition has been received.(2) If the board fails to dispose of a petition for review within six months, the action taken by the department regarding the petition for redetermination shall be deemed sustained.(3) The board may sustain the action taken by the department on the petition for redetermination or may take other action as the board deems necessary and consistent with provisions of this article.(e) Notice.--Written notice of the action of the board on a claimant's petition for review under this section shall be mailed to the department and the claimant.Section 2913-J. Appeal.A claimant aggrieved by a decision of the board may appeal the decision of the board in the manner provided by law for appeals from decisions of the board in tax cases.20250HB1328PN1528 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2025, or immediately, whichever is later.20250HB1328PN1528 - 12 - 12